Illinois, session 104th, HB1472.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by adding 5Section 12-39 as follows: 6    (720 ILCS 5/12-39 new)7    Sec. 12-39. Coercing an abortion.8    (a) In this Section:9    "Abortion" means the use of any instrument, medicine, 10drug, or any other substance or device to terminate the 11pregnancy of an individual known to be pregnant with an 12intention other than to increase the probability of a live 13birth, to preserve the life or health of the child after live 14birth, or to remove a dead fetus. 15    "Coercive control" means a direct or implied threat of 16danger, or retribution sufficient to coerce a reasonable 17person of ordinary susceptibilities to perform an act that 18otherwise would not have been performed, or acquiesce in an 19act to which one otherwise would not have submitted. 20    (b) A person commits coercing an abortion when the person 21uses force, intimidation, coercive control, threat of force, 22threat of deprivation of food and shelter, or financial 23assistance in order to compel a woman to undergo an abortion   HB1472- 2 -LRB104 03163 RLC 13184 b1against her will.2    (c) Coercing an abortion may occur regardless of whether 3an abortion procedure has been attempted or completed. 4    (d) Sentence. Coercing an abortion is a Class 3 felony.